California, session 20252026, SB438.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 46146.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:46146.5. (a) A day of attendance for a pupil enrolled in grade 11 or 12 at an early college high school or middle college high school is 180 minutes of attendance if the pupil is also enrolled part time in courses of the California State University or the University of California for which academic credit will be provided upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.(b) A day of attendance for a pupil enrolled in an early college high school or school, a middle college high school, or enrolled under a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement, who is also a special part-time student enrolled in a community college under Article 1 (commencing with Section 48800) of Chapter 5 of Part 27, and who will receive academic credit upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses, is 180 minutes of attendance.(c) A day of attendance for a pupil enrolled in an early college high school or school, a middle college high school school, or enrolled under a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement who does not satisfy subdivision (a) or (b) is 240 minutes of attendance.(d) For a charter school that is an early college high school or middle college high school, for purposes of calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of a pupil enrolled in grade 11 or 12 for a minimum of 50 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5 if the pupil is also enrolled part time in courses of the California State University or the University of California for which academic credit will be provided upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.(e) For a charter school that is an early college high school or middle college high school, for purposes of calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of a pupil for a minimum of 50 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5 if the pupil is also a special part-time student enrolled in a community college under Article 1 (commencing with Section 48800) of Chapter 5 of Part 27, and who will receive academic credit upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.(f) For a pupil enrolled in a charter school that is an early college high school or middle college high school and who does not satisfy the attendance and enrollment requirements of subdivision (d) or (e), for purposes of calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of the pupil for a minimum of 67 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5.(g) For purposes of this section, middle the following definitions apply:(1) “College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement” means the same as described in Section 76004.(2) “Middle college high school is means the same as described in Section 11300 and early college high school is means the same as described in Section 11302.(h) The requirements of this section shall be subject to annual audits, which shall be conducted pursuant to Section 41020.